Idaho, session 2025, S1032.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 68, Title 33, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 68
DISTRACTION-FREE LEARNING
33-6801. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Electronic communications device" means any device that uses
electronic signals to create, transmit, and receive information, including
cellular telephones.
(2) "School building" means any structure in which any instruction, ex-
tracurricular activities, or training provided by a school is conducted.
(3) "School grounds or premises" means the parcel of real property on
which any school building is located and any other parcel of real property
that is owned or leased by the local school district or public charter school
on which any instruction, extracurricular activities, or training of the
school is conducted.
(4) "School hours" means the designated period of the day when school is
open and in operation.
33-6802. DISTRACTION-FREE LEARNING. (1) No later than December 31,
2025, every local school board and public charter school shall adopt a policy
governing the use of electronic communications devices by students in school
buildings and on school grounds or premises during school hours. The policy
shall:
(a) Emphasize that student use of electronic communications devices
be as limited as possible in school buildings and on school grounds or
premises during school hours; and
(b) Reduce distractions related to the use of electronic communica-
tions devices in classroom settings during school hours.
(2) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to require a
local school board or public charter school to adopt a policy that prohibits
all use of electronic communications devices by students. However, local
school boards and public charter schools may adopt a policy prohibiting stu-
dents from carrying electronic communications devices in school buildings
and on school grounds or premises during school hours. A local school board


or public charter school that adopts such policy shall be considered to have
met the requirement to adopt a policy under this section.
(3) A policy adopted pursuant to the provisions of this section may
provide for exceptions to the use of electronic communications devices,
including but not limited to accommodations for individualized education
programs. Each policy shall specify any disciplinary measures for viola-
tions of the policy.
(4) Every local school board and public charter school shall make the
policy it adopts pursuant to the provisions of this section publicly avail-
able and display such policy prominently on its public website.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.